Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2710
Witness fees; criminal cases in district court; by whom paid.

The fees of all witnesses in criminal cases in the district court shall be paid by the county where the indictment is found.

Laws 1875, § 1, p. 33;

R.S.1913, § 9246;

C.S.1922, § 10275;

C.S.1929, § 29-2710;

R.S.1943, § 29-2710.

Section does not create new liability on county. Hewerkle v. Gage County, 14 Neb. 18, 14 N.W. 549 (1883).